Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.510

Safety zone.

"Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is marked or indicated by painted marks, signs, buttons, standards, or otherwise, so as to be plainly discernible.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.510. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 55; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]